test/src/morphology/N-aqbbwnz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aʼbbõnz: # Noun 228 'eng /est habemekarv/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbbõnz
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbbõn
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Par: aʼbbõnzt
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Dat: aʼbbõnõn
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Ins: aʼbbõnõks
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Ill: aʼbbõnõ
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Ela: aʼbbõnõst
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Nom: aʼbbõnd
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Gen: aʼbbõnd
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Par: aʼbbiņi
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbbõndõn
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbbõndõks
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbbiņiž
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbbiņist
